Tennessee statutes. Title 43 Agriculture And Horticulture
Chapter 23

Public Mills [Repealed]

43-23-101. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former ch. 23, §§ 43-23-101 — 43-23-126 concerning public mills, was repealed by Acts 2006, ch. 863, § 12, effective July 1, 2006.

43-23-102. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former ch. 23, §§ 43-23-101 — 43-23-126, concerning public mills, was repealed by Acts 2006, ch. 863, § 12, effective July 1, 2006.

43-23-103. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former ch. 23, §§ 43-23-101 — 43-23-126, concerning public mills, was repealed by Acts 2006, ch. 863, § 12, effective July 1, 2006.

43-23-104. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former ch. 23, §§ 43-23-101 — 43-23-126, concerning public mills, was repealed by Acts 2006, ch. 863, § 12, effective July 1, 2006.

43-23-105. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former ch. 23, §§ 43-23-101 — 43-23-126, concerning public mills, was repealed by Acts 2006, ch. 863, § 12, effective July 1, 2006.

43-23-106. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former ch. 23, §§ 43-23-101 — 43-23-126, concerning public mills, was repealed by Acts 2006, ch. 863, § 12, effective July 1, 2006.

43-23-107. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former ch. 23, §§ 43-23-101 — 43-23-126, concerning public mills, was repealed by Acts 2006, ch. 863, § 12, effective July 1, 2006.

43-23-108. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former ch. 23, §§ 43-23-101 — 43-23-126, concerning public mills, was repealed by Acts 2006, ch. 863, § 12, effective July 1, 2006.

43-23-109. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former ch. 23, §§ 43-23-101 — 43-23-126, concerning public mills, was repealed by Acts 2006, ch. 863, § 12, effective July 1, 2006.

43-23-110. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former ch. 23, §§ 43-23-101 — 43-23-126, concerning public mills, was repealed by Acts 2006, ch. 863, § 12, effective July 1, 2006.

43-23-111. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former ch. 23, §§ 43-23-101 — 43-23-126, concerning public mills, was repealed by Acts 2006, ch. 863, § 12, effective July 1, 2006.

43-23-112. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former ch. 23, §§ 43-23-101 — 43-23-126, concerning public mills, was repealed by Acts 2006, ch. 863, § 12, effective July 1, 2006.

43-23-113. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former ch. 23, §§ 43-23-101 — 43-23-126, concerning public mills, was repealed by Acts 2006, ch. 863, § 12, effective July 1, 2006.

43-23-114. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former ch. 23, §§ 43-23-101 — 43-23-126, concerning public mills, was repealed by Acts 2006, ch. 863, § 12, effective July 1, 2006.

43-23-115. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former ch. 23, §§ 43-23-101 — 43-23-126, concerning public mills, was repealed by Acts 2006, ch. 863, § 12, effective July 1, 2006.

43-23-116. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former ch. 23, §§ 43-23-101 — 43-23-126, concerning public mills, was repealed by Acts 2006, ch. 863, § 12, effective July 1, 2006.

43-23-117. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former ch. 23, §§ 43-23-101 — 43-23-126, concerning public mills, was repealed by Acts 2006, ch. 863, § 12, effective July 1, 2006.

43-23-118. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former ch. 23, §§ 43-23-101 — 43-23-126, concerning public mills, was repealed by Acts 2006, ch. 863, § 12, effective July 1, 2006.

43-23-119. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former ch. 23, §§ 43-23-101 — 43-23-126, concerning public mills, was repealed by Acts 2006, ch. 863, § 12, effective July 1, 2006.

43-23-120. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former ch. 23, §§ 43-23-101 — 43-23-126, concerning public mills, was repealed by Acts 2006, ch. 863, § 12, effective July 1, 2006.

43-23-121. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former ch. 23, §§ 43-23-101 — 43-23-126, concerning public mills, was repealed by Acts 2006, ch. 863, § 12, effective July 1, 2006.

43-23-122. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former ch. 23, §§ 43-23-101 — 43-23-126, concerning public mills, was repealed by Acts 2006, ch. 863, § 12, effective July 1, 2006.

43-23-123. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former ch. 23, §§ 43-23-101 — 43-23-126, concerning public mills, was repealed by Acts 2006, ch. 863, § 12, effective July 1, 2006.

43-23-124. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former ch. 23, §§ 43-23-101 — 43-23-126, concerning public mills, was repealed by Acts 2006, ch. 863, § 12, effective July 1, 2006.

43-23-125. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former ch. 23, §§ 43-23-101 — 43-23-126, concerning public mills, was repealed by Acts 2006, ch. 863, § 12, effective July 1, 2006.

43-23-126. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former ch. 23, §§ 43-23-101 — 43-23-126, concerning public mills, was repealed by Acts 2006, ch. 863, § 12, effective July 1, 2006.